Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Federal
Education Guidance Disclosure Act".
B. Within five (5) days of receiving a guidance document from
the United States Department of Education, the State Department of
Education shall publish the guidance document on an Internet website
designated by the State Superintendent of Public Instruction unless
the guidance document contains sensitive or confidential information
not legal to disclose due to privacy laws.

C. 1. The State Department of Education shall create the
designated Internet website for publication described in subsection
B of this section no later than ninety (90) days after the effective
date of this act.
2. The State Department of Education shall include hyperlinks
on the Internet website, in a conspicuous manner, that provide
access to the guidance documents received pursuant to subsection B
of this section.
D. If a guidance document is rescinded by the United States
Department of Education, the State Department of Education shall
maintain the rescinded guidance document at the location described
in subsection C of this section and indicate within fifteen (15)
days of such rescission:
1. That the document has been rescinded; and
2. The date the document was rescinded.
E. For purposes of this section, "guidance document" means a
federal agency statement of general applicability, other than a rule
that has the force and effect of law promulgated in accordance with
the notice and comment procedures under 5 U.S.C., Section 553, that
is designated by an agency official as setting forth a policy or
interpretation on a statutory, regulatory, or technical issue. A
guidance document may include, but is not limited to, a memorandum,
notice, bulletin, directive, letter, or no-action letter. The term
guidance document shall be construed broadly to effectuate the
purpose and intent of this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2151 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 17th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2151 Page 3